Alabama, session 2026rs, SB310.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. The Legislature hereby finds and declares
that it is necessary to provide additional funding to
stabilize the health care industry, develop transportation
infrastructure, and bolster public safety in the City of
Montgomery.
Section 2. The governing body of the City of
Montgomery, by ordinance or resolution, may levy and impose a
municipal license tax or fee upon any individual who engages
in or follows any trade, occupation, or profession in the
municipality.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.
Page 1